Utah statutes.
58-71-202.   Naturopathic formulary peer committee.
(1)  The division shall establish a naturopathic formulary advisory peer
committee under Subsection 58-1-203(1)(f) to make recommendations to the board
for the naturopathic formulary which shall:
(a)  consist of noncontrolled legend medications deemed appropriate for the
scope of practice of naturopathic physicians; and
(b)  include all homeopathic remedies.
(2)  The committee shall consist of five members:
(a)  one naturopathic physician who is a member of the board;
(b) three naturopathic physicians who are not members of the board; and
(c)  one licensed pharmacist who is also a pharmacognosist.
(3)  The committee members shall:
(a)  be appointed by the director of the division;
(b)  be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201, except as
those provisions are modified by this section; and
(c)  serve without compensation, travel costs, or per diem for their services.
(4)  The committee and the division may seek input from other licensing
boards.
